Utah statutes.
20A-11-905.   Election polls -- Disclosure required.

(1)  A person who conducts a poll shall disclose to the person being surveyed who paid for the poll before or at the conclusion of the poll.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  impose a $100 fine on a person who fails to make the disclosure required under Subsection (1); and

(b)  deposit the fine described in Subsection (2)(a) in the General Fund.

(3)  A person does not violate Subsection (1) if the person is prevented from making the disclosure at the conclusion of the poll, because the person being surveyed terminates the survey before the survey is completed.



Enacted by Chapter 86, 2013 General Session

